Utah statutes.
58-40-7.   Recreational therapy treatment or intervention plans.

(1)  Under this chapter, a recreational therapy treatment or intervention plan shall be maintained for each patient.

(2)  The plan shall include:

(a)  an assessment based on the strengths, limitations, interests, and needs of the patient;

(b)  prescribed intervention strategies and approaches;

(c)  patient goals and  measurable treatment or intervention objectives and outcomes; and

(d)  evaluations of progress and treatment.

